Utah statutes.
76-10-1227.   Indecent public displays -- Definitions.
(1)  For purposes of this section and Section 76-10-1228:
(a)  "Description or depiction of illicit sex or sexual immorality" means:
(i)  human genitals in a state of sexual stimulation or arousal;
(ii)  acts of human masturbation, sexual intercourse, or sodomy;
(iii)  fondling or other erotic touching of human genitals or pubic region; or
(iv)  fondling or other erotic touching of the human buttock or female breast.
(b)  "Nude or partially denuded figure" means:
(i)  less than completely and opaquely covering human:
(A)  genitals;
(B)  pubic regions;
(C)  buttock; and
(D)  female breast below a point immediately above the top of the areola; and
(ii)  human male genitals in a discernibly turgid state, even if completely
and opaquely covered.
(2) (a)  Subject to Subsection (2)(c), this section and Section 76-10-1228 do
not apply to any material which, when taken as a whole, has serious value for
minors.
(b)  As used in Subsection (2)(a), "serious value" means having serious
literary, artistic, political, or scientific value for minors, taking into
consideration the ages of all minors who could be exposed to the material.
(c)  A description or depiction of illicit sex or sexual immorality as defined
in Subsection (1)(a)(i), (ii), or (iii) has no serious value for minors.
